Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.060

Gambling commission—Counsel—Audits—Payment for.

(1) The attorney general shall be general counsel for the state gambling commission and shall assign such assistants as may be necessary in carrying out the purposes and provisions of this chapter, which shall include instituting and prosecuting any actions and proceedings necessary thereto.

(2) The state auditor shall audit the books, records, and affairs of the commission annually. The commission shall pay to the state treasurer for the credit of the state auditor such funds as may be necessary to defray the costs of such audits. The commission may provide for additional audits by certified public accountants. All such audits shall be public records of the state.

The payment for legal services and audits as authorized in this section shall be paid upon authorization of the commission from moneys in the gambling revolving fund.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 6.]